ja: 電子ドラムModulesサンプルインポートサポート: Bluetooth; MIDIサンプルダンプ (レガシー); サンプルインポートなし; SDカード; USBマスストレージ; Wi-Fi; その他
es: Compatibilidad con importación de muestras de módulo de batería electrónica: Bluetooth; Volcado de muestras MIDI (heredado); Sin importación de muestras; Tarjeta SD; Almacenamiento masivo USB; Wi-Fi; Otro
nb: Elektronisk trommelmodul prøveimportstøtte: Bluetooth; MIDI-sample dump (eldre); Ingen sample-import; SD-kort; USB-masselagring; Wi-Fi; Annet
tr: Elektronik davul modülü örnek içe aktarma desteği: Bluetooth; MIDI sample dump (eski); Sample içe aktarımı yok; SD kart; USB yığın depolama; Wi‑Fi; Diğer
vi: Hỗ trợ nhập mẫu của mô-đun trống điện tử: Bluetooth; Đổ mẫu MIDI (cũ); Không hỗ trợ nhập mẫu; Thẻ SD; Thiết bị lưu trữ USB; Wi‑Fi; Khác
de: Unterstützung des Sample-Imports für elektronische Drum-Module: Bluetooth; MIDI Sample Dump (Legacy); Kein Sample-Import; SD-Karte; USB-Massenspeicher; WLAN; Sonstige
pl: Obsługa importu sampli przez moduł perkusji elektronicznej: Bluetooth; Zrzut próbek przez MIDI (starsze modele); Brak importu próbek; Karta SD; Pamięć masowa USB; Wi-Fi; Inne
en: Electronic drum module sample import support: Bluetooth; MIDI sample dump (legacy); No sample import; SD card; USB mass storage; Wi‑Fi; Other
bg-BG: Поддръжка за импорт на семпли в електронен барабанен модул.: Bluetooth; MIDI дъмп на семпли (стара версия); Без импортиране на семпли; SD карта; USB памет; Wi‑Fi; Други
el: Υποστήριξη εισαγωγής δειγμάτων στη μονάδα ηλεκτρονικών τυμπάνων: Bluetooth; MIDI sample dump (παλαιού τύπου); Χωρίς εισαγωγή δειγμάτων; Κάρτα SD; Μαζική αποθήκευση USB; Wi‑Fi; Άλλο
sv: Stöd för import av användarljud för elektronisk trummodul: Bluetooth; MIDI sample dump (äldre); Ingen sampelimport; SD-kort; USB-masslagring; Wi‑Fi; Övrigt
fr: Importation d’échantillons par le module de batterie électronique: Bluetooth; Vidage d’échantillons MIDI (hérité); Aucune importation d’échantillons; Carte SD; Stockage de masse USB; Wi‑Fi; Autre
pt-PT: Modules de bateria eletrónica amostra importação assistência: Bluetooth; MIDI sample dump (legado); Sem importação de samples; Cartão SD; Armazenamento de massa USB; Wi-Fi; Outro
nl: Elektronische drummodule sample-import ondersteuning: Bluetooth; MIDI-sampledump (verouderd); Geen sample-import; SD-kaart; USB-massaopslag; Wifi; Overige
hr-HR: Podrška za uvoz uzoraka modula elektroničkog bubnja: Bluetooth; MIDI prijenos uzoraka (naslijeđeno); Nema uvoza uzoraka; SD kartica; USB masovna pohrana; Wi‑Fi; Ostalo
it: Modules di batteria elettronica sample import impostazione: Bluetooth; MIDI sample dump (legacy); Nessuna importazione campioni; Scheda SD; Memoria di massa USB; Wi‑Fi; Altro
cs: Podpora importu samplů u elektronických bicích: Bluetooth; Přenos samplů přes MIDI (starší); Bez importu samplů; SD karta; USB Mass Storage; Wi‑Fi; Jiné
ko: 전자 드럼 모듈 샘플 가져오기 지원: 블루투스; MIDI 샘플 덤프(레거시); 샘플 가져오기 불가; SD 카드; USB 대용량 저장소; Wi-Fi; 기타
da: Understøttelse af import af samples til elektroniske trommemoduler: Bluetooth; MIDI sample dump (ældre); Ingen sample-import; SD-kort; USB-masselagring; Wi‑Fi; Andet
zh-CN: 电子鼓模块采样导入支持: 蓝牙; MIDI 采样转储（旧版）; 无采样导入; SD 卡; USB 大容量存储; Wi‑Fi; 其他
sk-SK: Podpora importu vzoriek do modulu elektrických bicích: Bluetooth; MIDI sample dump (staršie); Bez importu vzoriek; Karta SD; Úložisko USB (mass storage); Wi‑Fi; Iné
pt-BR: Suporte à importação de samples para módulos de bateria eletrônica: Bluetooth; MIDI sample dump (legado); Sem importação de sample; Cartão SD; Armazenamento em massa USB; Wi-Fi; Outro
th: ตัวอย่างการนำเข้า Modules กลองอิเล็กทรอนิกส์ ความช่วยเหลือ: Bluetooth; การดัมป์ตัวอย่าง MIDI (รุ่นเก่า); ไม่มีการอิมพอร์ตตัวอย่าง; การ์ด SD; อุปกรณ์จัดเก็บข้อมูล USB; Wi‑Fi; อื่นๆ
hu: Elektronikus modulok mintaimportálási támogatása: Bluetooth; MIDI sample dump (örökölt); Nincs mintaimportálás; SD-kártya; USB háttértár; Wi‑Fi; Egyéb
fi: Elektronisen rumpumoduulin näytteiden tuontituki: Bluetooth; MIDI sample dump (vanha); Ei näytteiden tuontia; SD-kortti; USB-massamuisti; Wi-Fi; Muu
zh-TW: 電子鼓模組取樣匯入支援: 藍牙; MIDI 取樣匯出 (舊版); 無取樣匯入; SD 記憶卡; USB 隨身碟; Wi‑Fi; 其他
ro-RO: Asistență pentru import de mostre a modulului de tobe electronice: Bluetooth; Transfer eșantioane MIDI (legacy); Fără import de eșantioane; Card SD; Stocare în masă USB; Wi‑Fi; Altele
lt-LT: Elektroninių būgnų modulio semplų importo palaikymas: Bluetooth; MIDI garso pavyzdžių perdavimas (pasenęs); Pavyzdžių importavimas negalimas; SD kortelė; USB masinės atminties įrenginys; „Wi-Fi“; Kita
sl-SI: Podpora za uvoz vzorcev Modules elektronskih bobnov: Bluetooth; Prenos vzorcev MIDI (starejša različica (legacy)); Brez uvoza vzorcev; Kartica SD; Masovni pomnilnik USB; Wi-Fi; Drugo
ru: Поддержка импорта семплов электронным барабанным модулем: Bluetooth; Передача семплов по MIDI (устаревшее); Импорт семплов не поддерживается; SD-карта; USB-накопитель; Wi‑Fi; Другое